Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB648.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Hospital-Based Financial Assistance Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Eligible patient." An individual who meets all of the following requirements:(1) Is a resident of this Commonwealth.12345678910111213141516171819 (2) Can demonstrate an inability to pay the cost of medical care even after the application of payments for third-party health coverage.(3) Provides financial information and documentation showing that their income and assets make them eligible for hospital-based financial assistance under the policies of the hospital and of this act."Hospital." A nonprofit or private hospital in this Commonwealth."Hospital-based financial assistance." Financial assistance provided by hospitals to patients that includes charity care or discounted care where the cost of care ordinarily charged by a hospital is provided free of charge or at a reduced rate or a hospital relieves an eligible patient's medical bill in part or in full based on eligibility criteria.Section 3. Hospital-based financial assistance forms.(a) Forms.--The department shall develop the following forms and make them available to hospitals and the general public:(1) A uniform application for financial assistance that shall be used in every hospital in this Commonwealth to determine if an individual is an eligible patient.(2) A uniform one-page template all hospitals shall use to summarize each hospital's eligibility information for hospital-based financial assistance.(3) A brief uniform statement of the availability of hospital-based financial assistance and of the application for hospital-based financial assistance.(b) Development of form.--The department shall include input from hospitals and the general public in developing the forms described in subsection (a)(1), (2) and (3).20250SB0648PN0707 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Time frame.--The department shall develop the forms within 180 days of the effective date of this subsection.Section 4. Information about hospital-based financial assistance programs.(a) Accessibility of forms.--Each form outlined in section 3(a) shall be posted by hospitals online in a publicly accessible format. A full copy of the hospital's financial assistance policies shall also be published along with the summary in section 3(a)(2).(b) Disclosure to patients.--A hospital shall provide the form discussed in section 3(a)(2) to all patients upon intake and discharge. Additionally, a hospital shall place the uniform statement provided for in section 3(a)(3) on all bills, billing statements, good faith estimates, admittance forms and discharge paperwork.(c) Liability for bills.--Upon submission of a completed application for hospital-based financial assistance, the patient shall not be liable for any bills until the hospital has rendered a decision on the application.Section 5. Reporting of hospital-based financial assistance policies.All hospitals that have a hospital-based financial assistance policy shall provide a full copy of the hospital's financial assistance policies and the summary specified in section 3(a)(2) to the department for placement on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 6. Applicability.This act shall apply to each hospital with a hospital-based financial assistance policy.Section 7. Effective date.20250SB0648PN0707 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This act shall take effect as follows:(1) Sections 4 and 5 shall take effect in 270 days.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0648PN0707 - 4 - 1234